Louisiana, session 2026, HB982.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The portion of Louisiana Highway 133 North in the Village of Oak Ridge,
between south of Fluker Lane and the Village of Oak Ridge corporate limits, shall be known
and is hereby designated as the "Erle McKoin 'Niney' Barham Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The portion of Louisiana Highway 133 South in the Village of Oak Ridge,
between north of Buck Shepard Road and the Village of Oak Ridge corporate limits, shall
be known and is hereby designated as the "Joseph Sidney Carter Memorial Highway".
Section 3. The portion of Louisiana Highway 134 West in the Village of Oak Ridge
between east of Lake Erwin Road and the Village of Oak Ridge corporate limits, shall be
known and is hereby designated as the "Abner Wimberly Memorial Highway".
Section 4. The portion of Louisiana Highway 134 East in the Village of Oak Ridge,
between west of Pipes Lane and the Village of Oak Ridge corporate limits, shall be known
and is hereby designated as the "James Wallace McLendon Memorial Highway".
Page 1 of 2

HB NO. 982 ENROLLED
Section 5. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting these designations
provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's
actual cost for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to
exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2